Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.250

Coordination of procedures and content of assessments.

The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate both the procedures and the content of the tests and assessments required by the state to maximize the value of the information provided to students as they progress and to teachers and parents about students' talents, interests, and academic needs or deficiencies so that appropriate programs can be provided to enhance the likelihood of students' success both in school and beyond.

[ 1999 c 373 s 602; 1990 c 101 s 4.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 373: See note following RCW 28A.300.310.